North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15 Education
CHAPTER 15-15 School of Science

15-15-01.
School of science — Location.

The school of science must be located at Wahpeton, North Dakota.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 158, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 923; R.C. 1899, § 923; S.L. 1903, ch. 50, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 1092; S.L. 1907, ch. 100, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 1596; 1925 Supp., § 1596; R.C. 1943, § 15-1501.

Cross-References.

Control and administration by state board of higher education, see N.D.C.C. § 15-10-01.

15-15-02.
Object — Courses of instruction. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 162, § 1.